Oklahoma, session 2025, SB129.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 14-115.4, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 14-115.4. A. 1. A registered voter may apply for an


in-person absentee ballot at a location designated by the secretary


of the county election board from:


a. 8 a.m. to 6 p.m. on the Thursday and Friday fourteen


calendar days immediately preceding any election


conducted by a county election board,


b. 8 a.m. to 2 p.m. on the Saturday immediately preceding


a General Election, Primary Election, Runoff Primary


Election or Presidential Preferential Primary Election



Req. No. 225 Page 1


as described in Sections 1-101, 1-102, 1-103 and 20-


101 of this title, and


c. 8 a.m. to 6 p.m. on the Wednesday immediately


preceding a General Election as described in Section


1-101 of this title.


2. As part of the application for an in-person absentee ballot


such registered voter shall swear or affirm that the voter has not


voted a regular mail absentee ballot and that the voter will not


vote at the regular polling place in the election for which the in-


person absentee ballot is requested.


3. The secretary of the county election board in counties with


twenty-five thousand (25,000) or more registered voters, or with an


area in excess of one thousand five hundred (1,500) square miles,


may designate more than one location as an in-person absentee


polling place for an election, subject to the approval of and


pursuant to the procedures prescribed by the Secretary of the State


Election Board.


B. 1. The voter also shall provide proof of identity as


defined in Section 7-114 of this title. If the voter declines to or


is unable to produce proof of identity, the voter may sign a


statement under oath, in a form approved by the Secretary of the


State Election Board, swearing or affirming that the person is the


person identified on the precinct registry, and shall be allowed to



Req. No. 225 Page 2


cast a provisional ballot as provided in Section 7-116.1 of this


title.


2. False swearing or affirming under oath shall be punishable


as a felony as provided in Section 16-103 of this title, and the


penalty shall be distinctly set forth on the face of the statement.


C. One or more absentee voting boards shall be on duty at the


in-person absentee polling place on the days and during the hours


set forth in subsection A of this section. If the secretary of a


county election board receives an application from a registered


voter requesting to vote by in-person absentee ballot, the secretary


shall cause to be implemented the following procedures:


1. An absentee voting board shall provide to each registered


voter who applies for an in-person absentee ballot appropriate


ballots and materials as may be necessary to vote;


2. The voter must sign an in-person absentee voter record, and


the signature of the voter on such record must be certified by both


members of the absentee voting board, except that the secretary of


the county election board and one other member of the absentee


voting board may certify the signature of another member of the


absentee voting board;


3. The voter must mark the ballots of the voter in the manner


provided by law in the presence of the absentee voting board, but in


such a manner as to make it impossible for any person other than the


voter to ascertain how such ballots are marked. Insofar as is

Req. No. 225 Page 3


possible, the voting procedure shall be the same as if the voter


were casting a vote in person at a precinct;


4. The voter shall then deposit the ballot in a voting device


designated for in-person absentee voting by the secretary of the


county election board;


5. When the in-person polling place is closed on each day of


in-person absentee voting, the in-person absentee voting board


shall, without obtaining a printout of results, remove the


electronic results storage media from the voting device and seal


ballots counted that day in a transfer case which shall be secured


by the sheriff of the county in the same manner as provided in


Section 8-110 of this title. The electronic results storage media


shall be sealed in a container prescribed by the Secretary of the


State Election Board. The sheriff shall secure the sealed


electronic results storage media container and return it to the in-


person absentee voting board no later than 7:45 a.m. on the next day


of in-person absentee voting or to the secretary of the county


election board at the time of the county election board meeting to


count absentee ballots on election day; and


6. If there is a malfunction in such a way that the electronic


results storage media used for in-person absentee voting will not


function, the sheriff is authorized to return the transfer cases


containing in-person absentee ballots to the county election board


to be recounted as provided in Section 7-134.1 of this title.

Req. No. 225 Page 4


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective January 1, 2026.




60-1-225 TEK 12/27/2024 1:40:01 PM











































Req. No. 225 Page 5